Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 2. Distribution of Powers

§ 1. Powers of government divided into three departments.

The powers of the government of this state are divided into three distinct departments: The legislative, executive and judicial, and no person or collection of persons charged with the exercise of powers properly belonging to one of these departments shall exercise any powers properly belonging to either of the others, except as in this constitution expressly directed or permitted.

Cross references. —

For provision that military shall be subordinate to the civil power, see art. 1, § 25, Wyo. Const.

As to legislative department, see art. 3, §§ 1 to 52, Wyo. Const. and title 28.

As to executive department, see art. 4, §§ 1 to 15, Wyo. Const. and title 9.

As to judicial department, see art. 5, §§ 1 to 29, Wyo. Const. and title 5.

Treasurer’s power usurped. —

Public contract bidders must comply with statutory requirements. —

State, not court, empowered to defer prosecution. —

Legislature, not courts, to define crimes and punishments. —

So death penalty statutes do not usurp power of supreme court. —

Parole is executive function; probation is judicial function. —

Parole board authority reviewed upon reverse decision. —

Legislative regulation of entry on pleadings. —

Procedural statute. —

Judiciary cannot determine qualifications for membership in house of representatives. —

Judicial department may not assume “executive” duties unless part of criminal penalty. —

Criminal statute may constitutionally forbid prosecution under reduced charge. —

Court without jurisdiction to expunge criminal record for purpose of restoring civil rights. —

Court may request probation officer to report probation violations. —

Court may find lesser-included or attempted crime. —

State auditor. —

State veterinarian. —

State engineer. —

Power of board of control to adjudicate priorities of water rights. —

State water within reservation. —

Authorizing public service commission to institute civil proceedings. —

Collective bargaining for fire fighters. —

Legislature may enact laws regulating seat belt use. —

Dismissal of charges with prejudice as discovery sanction. —

Treasurer’s power usurped. —

Wyo. Const. art. 2, § 1 prohibits any person or collection of persons charged with exercising the powers belonging to one of the three branches of government from exercising powers properly belonging to another branch, except as the Constitution expressly directs or permits. Wyo. Const. art. 3, § 31 expressly requires the state treasurer’s approval of contracts for repairing and furnishing areas used by the legislature. Wyoming’s capitol restoration legislation assigns all aspects of the project to the governor and other officials and groups created by the legislature. It, therefore, usurps the treasurer’s authority under Wyo. Const. art. 3, § 31 and violates the separation of powers provision of the Wyoming Constitution. Gordon v. State, 2018 WY 32, 413 P.3d 1093,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2018).

Prohibition in this section

is against the exercise by any department of the government of powers properly belonging to either of the other 2 departments. Carter v. Board of County Comm'rs, 518 P.2d 142,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1974).

Public contract bidders must comply with statutory requirements. —

The fact that the low bidder could establish itself as qualified to do the work on a state project in the judgment of the trial court on the basis of post-award court proceedings was immaterial, given its lack of response or noncompliance with the prescribed requirements of the proposal forms. Bids for public contracts must substantially comply with the requirements of the specifications for bidding and the directions to prospective bidders. The determination as to whether these requirements are satisfied and the awarding of a contract are acts of discretion which will be enjoined only if done illegally, arbitrarily, capriciously or unreasonably. State v. Weisz & Sons, 713 P.2d 176,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 458

(Wyo. 1986).

State, not court, empowered to defer prosecution. —

The executive department, not the judicial department, has the power to decide whether to defer prosecution under §

7-13-301

(placing guilty, unconvicted, person on probation). The exercise of that prosecutorial discretion is not subject to judicial review as long as any unjustifiable or suspect factors such as race, religion or other arbitrary or discriminatory classification are not involved. Thus, the requirement that the state consent to the court's deferral of further proceedings and placement of defendants on probation without entry of a judgment of conviction does not infringe on the judicial department's sentencing power in violation of the principle of separation of powers explicitly stated in this section. Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990), reh'g denied,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. Nov. 9, 1990); Mollman v. State, 800 P.2d 466,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1990); Hudson v. State, 800 P.2d 471,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1990); Heggen v. State, 800 P.2d 475,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1990); Cambio v. State, 800 P.2d 482,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1990).

Legislature, not courts, to define crimes and punishments. —

The power to determine what acts are crimes, and the punishment for those prohibited acts, belongs to the legislative branch as an absolute, exclusive and inherent power not shared with the courts. Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983).

So death penalty statutes do not usurp power of supreme court. —

The Wyoming death penalty provisions are not unconstitutional in that they do not usurp the supervisory and rule-making power of the supreme court and expand its jurisdiction in violation of the Wyoming constitution, Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983).

Parole is executive function; probation is judicial function. —

Parole is an executive agency function, incident to confinement following sentence; probation is a judicial function within which the probation and parole agents provide supervisory assistance to the judiciary. Hewitt v. State, 835 P.2d 348,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1992).

Parole board authority reviewed upon reverse decision. —

The defendant argued that § 7-13-421(c)(ii) violated the separation of powers requirement in his case because that statute might have permitted the parole board to perform both legislative and judicial functions by allowing the board to extend the period of his possible parole in the event he failed to make restitution. Because the board had not yet exercised its statutory authority, however, the issue raised was not ripe for review. The defendant could seek review when he could demonstrate that the board had made some adverse decision. Brenning v. State, 870 P.2d 349,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1994).

Legislative regulation of entry on pleadings. —

The legislature is constitutionally prohibited from enacting statutes specifying the content of or foreclosing material from pleadings, as these are procedural matters. White v. Fisher, 689 P.2d 102,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1984).

Procedural statute. —

Statute which prohibits signing and filing pleadings for any improper purpose is unconstitutional, as it pertains to a procedural matter and thus constitutes an invasion by the legislature of the powers of the judicial branch of government. Squillace v. Kelley, 990 P.2d 497,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1999).

Judiciary cannot determine qualifications for membership in house of representatives. —

Qualifications for membership in the house of representatives are a political question beyond the jurisdiction of the judiciary to determine. State ex rel. Schieck v. Hathaway, 493 P.2d 759,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1972).

Judicial department may not assume “executive” duties unless part of criminal penalty. —

Although the surrender of a driver's license as a part of the penalty defined by the legislature for driving while intoxicated can be the function of the court imposing sentence, the legislature has not seen fit to include suspension or revocation of drivers' licenses as part of the criminal penalty, and therefore the provisions in § 31-5-233(e) (prior to its amendment in 1984) for collection of a driver's license by the court and for the issuance of a temporary driver's license by the court are unconstitutional in that they violate this section by directing the judicial branch of the government to exercise powers properly belonging to the executive branch. State ex rel. Motor Vehicle Div. v. Holtz, 674 P.2d 732,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1983).

Criminal statute may constitutionally forbid prosecution under reduced charge. —

The defendant, charged under § 31-5-233(j), which provides that “any person charged under this section [driving while under the influence of alcohol] shall be prosecuted under this section and not under a reduced charge,” had no right to any plea bargain with the prosecutor nor to the reduction or dismissal of charges against her. Without such a right, she had no standing to challenge the constitutionality of § 31-5-233(j) on the grounds that it constituted an infringement on the prosecutorial discretion of the executive branch of government, which is a violation of the constitutional separation of powers. Gooden v. State, 711 P.2d 405,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 618

(Wyo. 1985).

A stipulation setting forth the traditional plea bargaining practice in the municipal court of the city of Cheyenne was not sufficient to afford defendant standing to challenge the constitutionality of § 31-5-233(j) (driving under the influence), on the alleged ground that it violates the separation of powers doctrine. Lacombe v. Cheyenne, 733 P.2d 601,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 400

(Wyo. 1987).

Court without jurisdiction to expunge criminal record for purpose of restoring civil rights. —

An expungement of a criminal record by a court, under its inherent powers, of one not pardoned, whose conviction was without error, and only for the purpose of restoring civil rights, would have been an encroachment on the power of the executive branch, i.e., the pardoning power of the governor, and the district court properly refused to take such action as being beyond its jurisdiction. Stanton v. State, 686 P.2d 587,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 328

(Wyo. 1984).

Court may request probation officer to report probation violations. —

A request of the trial court that the assigned probation officer report violations of the court order to the prosecuting attorney neither constitutes an abuse of judicial discretion nor intrudes into a separation of powers function of the executive agency. Hewitt v. State, 835 P.2d 348,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1992).

Court may find lesser-included or attempted crime. —

No violation of the separation of powers doctrine occurred when a trial court found a juvenile guilty of attempted shoplifting even though the juvenile petition only charged shoplifting and was never amended to include a charge of attempted shoplifting since a trial court may properly rely on Rule 31 W.R.Cr.P. to find a juvenile defendant guilty of a lesser-included or attempted offense even if not originally charged. MJS v. State (In re MJS), 2001 WY 31, 20 P.3d 506,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2001).

Validity of statute in relation to constitution is power which vests in courts

as one of the checks and balances contemplated by the division of government into three departments — legislative, executive and judicial. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

State auditor. —

The state auditor is an officer of the executive department and, under this section, is forbidden to exercise any powers belonging to the judicial department. His disallowance of a claim is reviewable by the supreme court notwithstanding statute which provides that the auditor shall audit claims, and may for that purpose compel attendance of witnesses the same as courts of record. State ex rel. Jeffrey v. Burdick, 3 Wyo. 588, 28 P. 146,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1891).

State veterinarian. —

A statute giving certain powers to the state veterinarian in accordance with art. 19, § 1, Wyo. Const., is not invalid as an unlawful delegation of power under this section. Arbuckle v. Pflaeging, 20 Wyo. 351, 123 P. 918,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1912).

State engineer. —

The state engineer is an executive officer appointed by and subject to removal by only the governor of In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

The state engineer is not subject to impeachment; neither the constitution nor the statutes contemplate that a district court should have the authority to remove or replace the state engineer as the administrator of Wyoming water. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

Power of board of control to adjudicate priorities of water rights. —

The board of control exercises part of the executive power of the state, and the power vested in it by art. 8, § 2, Wyo. Const., to adjudicate priorities of water rights, does not indicate that in this respect the judicial power of the courts has been superseded. Simmons v. Ramsbottom, 51 Wyo. 419, 68 P.2d 153,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1937).

Act conferring upon state board of control power to adjudicate priorities in public waters of state is not invalid as investing board with judicial powers. Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1900).

State water within reservation. —

A district court may not assign the duties of administering state water within a reservation to a tribal water agency. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

Authorizing public service commission to institute civil proceedings. —

The provisions of § 56, ch. 65, Laws 1935, regulating motor carriers, which authorized the public service commission to initiate appropriate civil proceedings to enforce obedience to, or for violation of, the act, did not violate this section. Public Serv. Comm'n v. Grimshaw, 49 Wyo. 158, 53 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1935).

Collective bargaining for fire fighters. —

Sections

27-10-101

to

27-10-109

, pertaining to collective bargaining for fire fighters, do not violate this section. State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

Legislature may enact laws regulating seat belt use. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-1402(f) does not violate the separation of powers doctrine because as a substantive law, its enactment was inherently within the powers delegated to the legislature by the Wyoming Constitution. Huff v. Shumate, 360 F. Supp. 2d 1197, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 27781 (D. Wyo. 2004).

Dismissal of charges with prejudice as discovery sanction. —

District court did not infringe on the prosecutors' decision to prosecute or decline to prosecute defendant by dismissing the charge against defendant with prejudice as a discovery sanction against the State because the court was not inserting itself into the decision of whether to bring charges but was instead attempting to enforce its own rules. State v. Naple, 2006 WY 125, 143 P.3d 358,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2006).

In holding that the Department of Family Services

must employ an accurate standard of need in administering the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program, the Wyoming Supreme Court did not invade the provinces of either the executive or legislative branches; the court did not order the state to participate in the federal program, order the department to set its standard of need at a particular level, or order the department to employ a particular methodology in determining the accurate standard of need, nor did the court order the state to maintain a particular benefit level and therefore did not order an increase in appropriations. Davidson v. Sherman, 848 P.2d 1341,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1993).

Applied

in

Brinegar v. Clark, 371 P.2d 62,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1962); City of Evanston v. Whirl Inn, Inc., 647 P.2d 1378,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1982); In re Declaration of Abandonment of Wolfley Appropriation, 695 P.2d 159,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 444

(Wyo. 1985); V-1 Oil Co. v. People, 799 P.2d 1199,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1990).

Quoted

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Teton County Youth Servs., Inc., 652 P.2d 400,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 393

(Wyo. 1982); Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State Bd. of Equalization, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 749 P.2d 221,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 572

(Wyo. 1987).

Stated

in

Sorenson v. State, 604 P.2d 1031,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 504

(Wyo. 1979); Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984); Ellett v. State, 883 P.2d 940,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Fristam v. City of Sheridan, 66 Wyo. 143, 206 P.2d 741,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1949); Steffey v. Casper, 358 P.2d 951,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1961); Nation v. Giant Drug Co., 396 P.2d 431,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1964); Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978); BHP Petroleum Co. v. State, 784 P.2d 621,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1989); In Interest of DG, 825 P.2d 369,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1992); Terex Corp. v. Hough, 2002 WY 112, 50 P.3d 317,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2002); Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003); State v. Newman, 2004 WY 41, 88 P.3d 445,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Administrative Regulation Review Act,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 189 (1979).

See article, “Administrative Regulation Review — Act II,” XV Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1980).

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

Applied

in

V-1 Oil Co. v. People, 799 P.2d 1199,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

In Interest of DG, 825 P.2d 369,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).